Oregon, session 2026R1, HB4071.
Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Operator” means a person that:
(A) Offers a person the opportunity to participate in a sport, fitness or recreational ac-
tivity; or
(B) Operates or provides a facility or place where a person can participate in a sport,
fitness or recreational activity.
(b) “Sport, fitness or recreational activity” means an indoor or outdoor activity involving
elements of inherent risk, including but not limited to hunting, fishing, swimming, boating,
rafting, biking, camping, skiing, snowboarding, winter sports, team and individual sports,
climbing, equestrian and rodeo activities, hiking, outfitter guiding, ocean and water sports,
motorized recreation, athletic or fitness competitions and fitness and training activities.
(2) An operator may require a person 18 years of age or older to release the operator
from any claim for ordinary negligence that arises out of or results from the person’s par-
ticipation in a sport, fitness or recreational activity, rental of equipment for a sport, fitness
or recreational activity, use of a facility or place for a sport, fitness or recreational activity
or volunteering to maintain facilities or places used for sport, fitness or recreational activ-
ities, before the person participates in the sport, fitness or recreational activity, rents
equipment, uses a facility or place or volunteers. A release described in this subsection is
not unconscionable or void as contrary to public policy.
(3) An operator may not require a person to release the operator from claims that con-
stitute greater than ordinary negligence. A release described in this subsection is severable
from a release for ordinary negligence required by the operator.
(4) A release that is broader than the release described in subsections (2) and (3) of this
section shall be construed within the limits stated in subsections (2) and (3) of this section.
SECTION 2. (1) The Oregon Business Development Department shall study recreation
commerce in Oregon. The study must:
(a) Quantify the overall economic benefits of Oregon’s recreation economy, including the
number of businesses and jobs created, including by various recreation subsectors, and re-
venue generated for local and state governments via income tax, property tax and other
means.
(b) Assess the needs of Oregon’s recreation industry and identify economic development
solutions to help strengthen Oregon’s recreation-related economy.
(c) Identify the primary issues facing the recreation industry, with a particular focus on
small business and nonprofit providers across all modes of recreation activities including but
not limited to hunting, fishing, swimming, boating, rafting, biking, camping, skiing,
snowboarding, winter sports, team and individual sports, climbing, equestrian and rodeo ac-
[2]

HB 4071
tivities, hiking, outfitter guiding, ocean and water sports, motorized recreation, athletic or
fitness competitions and fitness and training activities.
(d) Consider both tourism-based and local recreation-related activity.
(2) In conducting the study, the department shall consult with other relevant state
agencies as needed.
(3) The department shall report on the results of the study to an appropriate committee
or interim committee of the Legislative Assembly no later than December 15, 2026.
SECTION 3. Section 2 of this 2026 Act is repealed on January 2, 2027.
SECTION 4. (1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, section 1 of this 2026
Act applies to releases executed before, on or after the effective date of this 2026 Act.
(2)(a) Section 1 of this 2026 Act does not apply to the release of any claim for which a
final judgment has been entered before the effective date of this 2026 Act.
(b) As used in this subsection, “final judgment” means a judgment for which the time to
appeal has expired without any party filing an appeal or that is not subject to further appeal
or review.
SECTION 5. This 2026 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and this 2026 Act takes effect
on its passage.

[3]